Hawaii statutes.
[§636C-2] Definition. In this chapter
"foreign judgment" means any judgment, decree, or order of a court of
the United States or of any other court which is entitled to full faith and
credit in this State. [L 1983, c 31, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next